Utah statutes.
53B-13-113.   Bond approval by attorney general incontestable after 30 days -- Recital of certification.

(1)  The attorney general shall examine the resolutions and proceedings authorizing the issuance and confirming the sale of bonds under this chapter.

(2)  Once examined and certified as legal obligations by the attorney general, the bonds become incontestable in any court in the state unless suit is brought in a court having jurisdiction within 30 days from the date of certification.

(3)  The bonds certified under this section shall contain a recital on their face as follows: "This bond is one of a series of bonds which were certified as legal obligations by the Attorney General of the state of Utah on _______________."

(4)  Bonds authorized, issued, and sold under resolutions and proceedings certified by the attorney general are valid and binding obligations according to their terms.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

